Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2704
Act; how construed.

The Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act shall
be construed
to effect the purposes enumerated in section 44-2701.

Laws 1975, LB 217, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 593, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 18.